Tennessee, session 114, SB0030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-309(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivisions:
(5) Litters or trespasses upon any real or personal property of another person
with the intent to unlawfully intimidate another from the free exercise or enjoyment of any
right or privilege secured by the constitution or laws of the state of Tennessee; or
(6) Litters or trespasses upon any real or personal property of another person
with the intent to unlawfully intimidate another because that other exercised any right or
privilege secured by the constitution or laws of the United States or the constitution or
laws of the state of Tennessee.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-309, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
( ) As used in this section, "litters" means places, drops, or throws garbage,
refuse, rubbish, unsolicited flyers, or other waste material on any public or private
property without permission.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-309(d), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(1) A violation of subdivisions (b)(1)–(4) is a Class D felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (b)(5) or (6) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) A violation of subsection (c) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SB0030
000757
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 16, Part 6, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A law enforcement officer may ask a person to identify themselves if the
officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that the person has violated or is violating a
state law or local ordinance.
(b) Pursuant to the law enforcement officer's reasonable suspicion, the officer
may ask the suspect to provide the suspect's name verbally or to otherwise provide the
suspect's name by other means.
(c) A person commits an offense who intentionally refuses to give the person's
name to a law enforcement officer who has lawfully detained or arrested the person and
requested the information.
(d) A person commits an offense who intentionally gives a false or fictitious
name to a law enforcement officer who has lawfully detained or arrested the person.
(e) A violation of subsection (c) or (d) is a Class C misdemeanor.
(f) A person's failure or inability to produce a physical form of identification or
driver license to a police or peace officer requesting identification is not a violation of
subsection (c) or (d) if the person attempts to otherwise comply with the officer's request
to provide the person's identity verbally or in any other manner.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 16, Part 6, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who intentionally approaches, within twenty-
five feet (25'), a law enforcement officer who is lawfully engaged in the execution of the
officer's official duties after the officer has ordered the person to stop approaching or to
retreat.
- 2 - 000757

(b) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (a) that the lawful
order was not received or understood by the person and was not capable of being
received or understood under the conditions and circumstances that existed at the time
of the issuance of the order.
(c) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 8, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who, on the streets of any municipality, roads
of any county, or the highways of this state, transports another in the cargo area of a box
truck.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor.
(c) As used in this section, "box truck" means a moving van or other vehicle that
is manufactured with an enclosed cargo area that is connected to the passenger area
with a one-piece design or attached to the chassis with two-piece construction, and the
cargo area:
(1) Is designed primarily for the transportation of property; and
(2) Does not have seats or safety belts designed to accommodate a
passenger.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) It is an offense to place a sign, signal, or marking over a highway or to affix
or attach a sign, signal, or marking to a bridge, overpass, or tunnel without written
authorization from the entity that maintains the highway, bridge, overpass, or tunnel.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor.
- 3 - 000757

SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-7-118(c), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) The peace officer has probable cause to believe the person committed an
offense, regardless of whether the offense was committed in the peace officer's
presence.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-7-118(k), is amended by
redesignating the subsection as subdivision (k)(1) and adding the following:
(2) Whenever an officer makes a physical arrest for a misdemeanor and the
officer determines that a citation should not be issued as provided in subsection (c), the
officer shall note the reason for not issuing a citation on the arrest ticket. An officer who,
on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist, determines that
a citation should not be issued as provided in subsection (c) shall not be subject to civil
or criminal liability for false arrest, false imprisonment, or unlawful detention.
SECTION 10. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 000757